Massachusetts, session 194th, S2139.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13 of chapter 30A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
No board of registration operating pursuant to chapter 112 or agency shall deny issuance
of, revoke or refuse to renew any professional or occupational certificate, registration, license or
authority of an individual based on an individual’s default on an educational loan. This
paragraph shall not apply to the division of banks.
of 1